Wyoming, session 2025, SF0108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-1-122(a)(iii), by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and by renumbering (vi) as (vii) is amended
to read:
1-1-122. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(iii) "Sport or recreational opportunity" means
commonly understood sporting activities including but not
limited to baseball, softball, football, soccer,
basketball, swimming, hockey, wrestling, cheerleading,
rodeo, dude ranching, nordic or alpine skiing and other
alpine sports, snowboarding, mountain climbing, outdoor
education programs, river floating, hunting, fishing,
backcountry trips, horseback riding and any other equine
activity, snowmobiling, agritourism and similar
recreational opportunities and includes the use of private
lands for vehicle parking and land access related to the
sport or recreational opportunity. "Sport or recreational
opportunity" does not include skiing in a ski area as
defined by the Ski Safety Act;
(vi) "Agritourism" means activities on a farm,
ranch or other agricultural enterprise that allow for the
observation of, or participation in, the production,
harvesting, husbandry or processing of agricultural
products or livestock or of the natural, historical or
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0108
ENROLLED ACT NO. 76, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
cultural resources associated with agricultural enterprise
for educational, recreational or entertainment purposes
including, but not limited to, tours, hands-on experiences
and hospitality services.
(vi)(vii) "This act" means W.S. 1-1-121 through
1-1-123.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2